Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-170
Bessey Memorial Fund; investment; disbursement.

The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall from time to time invest and reinvest the Bessey Memorial Fund, as well as all unused increase or accumulations thereof, and all additions to the fund which may hereafter be made, in the same kind of securities as is now or may hereafter be authorized for investment of funds pursuant to section 72-1246. In all cases hereunder, money shall be paid out by the State Treasurer only on the direction of the Board of Regents, as in cases for the payment of expenses of the university, on appropriation duly made, and all unused funds, together with such securities, shall be in the custody of the State Treasurer.

Laws 1917, c. 239, § 5, p. 578;

C.S.1922, § 6783;

C.S.1929, § 85-173;

R.S.1943, § 85-170;

Laws 1947, c. 353, § 1, p. 1104;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 126, p. 2427;

Laws 2000, LB 1135, § 31.